Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-47] Detail or employment of
reporters and interpreters. Under such rules as the governor may adopt,
the convening authority of a general or special court-martial or court of
inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the
proceedings of and testimony taken before that court. Under like rules the
convening authority of a military court may detail or employ interpreters who
shall interpret for the court. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next